Utah statutes.
58-5a-307.   Consumer access to provider charges.

Beginning January 1, 2011, a podiatric physician licensed under this chapter shall, when requested by a consumer:

(1)  make a list of professional charges available for the consumer which includes the podiatric physician's 25 most frequently performed:

(a)  clinical procedures or clinical services;

(b)  out-patient procedures; and

(c)  in-patient procedures; and

(2)  provide the consumer with information regarding any discount available for:

(a)  services not covered by insurance; or

(b)  prompt payment of billed charges.



Enacted by Chapter 68, 2010 General Session

